apertium-cy-en/apertium-cy-en.cy.dix.xml
    <pardef n="c/ais__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r>ais<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eisiadau</l>
          <r>ais<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="anfant/ais__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r>ais<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eision</l>
          <r>ais<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cyn/nyrch__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nyrch</l>
          <r>nyrch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hyrchion</l>
          <r>nyrch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="br/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>öydd</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="athr/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>awon</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cyns/ail__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ail</l>
          <r>ail<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiliau</l>
          <r>ail<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pun/t__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nau</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="derbyn/neb__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>neb</l>
          <r>neb<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebau</l>
          <r>neb<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cad/air__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>air</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiriau</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="caethw/as__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eision</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pl/ân__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ân</l>
          <r>ân<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anau</l>
          <r>ân<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/wp__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wp</l>
          <r>wp<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ypiau</l>
          <r>wp<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/ôr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ôr</l>
          <r>ôr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oroedd</l>
          <r>ôr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ll/wgr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wgr</l>
          <r>wgr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ygrau</l>
          <r>wgr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="digon/edd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edd</l>
          <r>edd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>edd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cyn/hadledd__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hadledd</l>
          <r>hadledd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adleddau</l>
          <r>hadledd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ymatebw/yr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yr</l>
          <r>yr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>yr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ŷ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ŷ</l>
          <r>ŷ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>ŷ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sg/wrs__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wrs</l>
          <r>wrs<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yrsiau</l>
          <r>wrs<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cn/ydau__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ydau</l>
          <r>ydau<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wd</l>
          <r>ydau<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ffig/wr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wr</l>
          <r>wr<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yrau</l>
          <r>wr<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n/ant__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ant</l>
          <r>ant<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>entydd</l>
          <r>ant<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cwesti/ynau__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynau</l>
          <r>ynau<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wn</l>
          <r>ynau<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cyfrifian/nell__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nell</l>
          <r>nell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ellau</l>
          <r>nell<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tr/aed__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aed</l>
          <r>aed<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oed</l>
          <r>aed<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="palm/ant__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ant</l>
          <r>ant<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>entydd</l>
          <r>ant<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cart/ŵn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ŵn</l>
          <r>ŵn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wnau</l>
          <r>ŵn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="awr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          
            
            
            
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oriau</l>
          
            
            
            
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="punt"><par n="initial-p"/><i>un</i><par n="pun/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cadair"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ad</i><par n="cad/air__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ffair"><i>ff</i><par n="cad/air__n"/></e>
    <e lm="punt"><par n="initial-p"/><i>un</i><par n="pun/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ffigwr"><i>ffig</i><par n="ffig/wr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bro"><par n="initial-b"/><i>r</i><par n="br/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhithfro"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ithfr</i><par n="br/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyfrifiannell"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yfrifian</i><par n="cyfrifian/nell__n"/></e>
    <e lm="athro"><i>athr</i><par n="athr/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prifathro"><par n="initial-p"/><i>rifathr</i><par n="athr/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="derbynneb"><par n="initial-d"/><i>erbyn</i><par n="derbyn/neb__n"/></e>
    <e lm="derbynneb"><par n="initial-d"/><i>erbyn</i><par n="derbyn/neb__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cais"><par n="initial-c"/><i/><par n="c/ais__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cais"><par n="initial-c"/><i/><par n="c/ais__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anfantais"><i>anfant</i><par n="anfant/ais__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mantais"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ant</i><par n="anfant/ais__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sgwrs"><i>sg</i><par n="sg/wrs__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cynsail"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yns</i><par n="cyns/ail__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sail"><i>s</i><par n="cyns/ail__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cynnyrch"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yn</i><par n="cyn/nyrch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gweithgynnyrch"><par n="initial-g"/><i>weithgyn</i><par n="cyn/nyrch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caethwas"><par n="initial-c"/><i>aethw</i><par n="caethw/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwas"><par n="initial-g"/><i>w</i><par n="caethw/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plân"><i>pl</i><par n="pl/ân__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tân"><i>t</i><par n="pl/ân__n"/></e>
    <e lm="palmant"><par n="initial-p"/><i>alm</i><par n="palm/ant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nant"><i>n</i><par n="n/ant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cartŵn"><par n="initial-c"/><i>art</i><par n="cart/ŵn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cynhadledd"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yn</i><par n="cyn/hadledd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="awr"><i>awr</i><par n="awr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="môr"><i>m</i><par n="m/ôr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tŷ"><i>t</i><par n="t/ŷ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llwgr"><i>ll</i><par n="ll/wgr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="traed"><i>tr</i><par n="tr/aed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="swp"><i>s</i><par n="s/wp__n"/></e>
    <e lm="digonedd"><par n="initial-d"/><i>igon</i><par n="digon/edd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ymatebwyr"><i>ymatebw</i><par n="ymatebw/yr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cnydau"><par n="initial-c"/><i>n</i><par n="cn/ydau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cwestiynau"><par n="initial-c"/><i>westi</i><par n="cwesti/ynau__n"/></e>
